Wisconsin, session 2025, SB201.
do enact as follows:SB201,11Section 1. 106.11 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB201,2,22106.11 (title) Workforce investment programs; metrics.SB201,23Section 2. 106.11 of the statutes is renumbered 106.11 (1) (a) and amended 4to read:SB201,2,125106.11 (1) (a) The department shall cooperate with the federal government in 6carrying out the purposes of the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, 29 USC 72801 to 2945 Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, 29 USC 3101 to 3361. In 8administering the programs authorized by that act, the department shall, in 9cooperation with other state agencies and with local workforce development boards 10established under 29 USC 2832 3122, establish a statewide workforce investment 11system to meet the employment, training, and educational needs of persons in this 12state.SB201,2,1813(b) If a local workforce development board anticipates that there may be a 14business closing or mass layoff under s. 109.07 in the area served by that board, the 15board may prepare a list of resources available in that area that provide career 16planning, job search, job skills training, and other support services for affected 17employees, as defined in s. 109.07 (1) (a), including contact information for those 18resources, for distribution to those employees under s. 109.07 (1m) (a).SB201,31Section 3. 106.11 (1) (title) and (2) of the statutes are created to read:SB201,3,22106.11 (1) (title) Workforce investment.SB201,3,33(2) Workforce development metrics. (a) In this subsection:SB201,3,641. “Workforce development program or activity” means any program or 5coordinated activities funded in whole or in part by the state, whether by using 6state or federal funds, that does any of the following within this state:SB201,3,77a. Promotes or provides job training or work readiness services.SB201,3,88b. Assists individuals with looking for wage-earning work in this state.SB201,3,99c. Assists with or otherwise facilitates job placement within the state.SB201,3,11102. “Workforce development program or activity” includes all of the following, 11in addition to what is specified under subd. 1.:SB201,3,1312a. The Transform Milwaukee Jobs program and Transitional Jobs programs 13under s. 49.163.SB201,3,1514b. The department of corrections’ initiatives to reintegrate offenders into the 15community.SB201,3,1716c. The employment and training program administered by the department of 17children and families under s. 49.79 (9).SB201,3,1918d. The Wisconsin Works program administered by the department of children 19and families under ss. 49.141 to 49.161.SB201,3,2120e. Any workforce development program or activity funded, whether directly or 21indirectly, by the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2.SB201,4,222(b) 1. Any state agency or authority that operates, coordinates, or oversees a 23workforce development program or activity shall, subject to subd. 3., track and 1report on the performance of the workforce development program or activity, using 2all of the following primary indicators of performance:SB201,4,43a. The percentage of program or activity participants who are in unsubsidized 4employment during the 2nd quarter after exit from the program or activity.SB201,4,65b. The percentage of program or activity participants who are in unsubsidized 6employment during the 4th quarter after exit from the program or activity.SB201,4,87c. The median earnings of program participants who are in unsubsidized 8employment during the 2nd quarter after exit from the program.SB201,4,189d. The percentage of program or activity participants who obtain a recognized 10postsecondary credential, or a secondary school diploma or its recognized 11equivalent, during participation in or within one year after exit from the program 12or activity. For purposes of this subd. 1. d., program or activity participants who 13obtain a secondary school diploma or its recognized equivalent shall be included in 14the percentage counted as meeting the criterion only if such participants, in 15addition to obtaining such diploma or its recognized equivalent, have obtained or 16retained employment or are in an education or training program leading to a 17recognized postsecondary credential within one year after exit from the program or 18activity.SB201,4,2219e. The percentage of program participants who, during a program year, are in 20an education or training program that leads to a recognized postsecondary 21credential or employment and who are achieving measurable skill gains toward 22such a credential or employment.SB201,5,223f. The percentage of participants in unsubsidized employment during the 2nd 1quarter after exit from the program or activity who were employed by the same 2employer in the 2nd and 4th quarters after exit.SB201,5,532. Any state agency or authority that is required to perform the tracking and 4reporting under subd. 1. shall publish the data through a single, state-maintained 5website.SB201,5,763. A state agency is not required to do any of the following under subds. 1. and 72.:SB201,5,88a. Report data on minors.SB201,5,119b. Report on the performance of a workforce development program or activity 10to the extent that such reporting would violate confidentiality requirements under 11federal law.SB201,5,14124. The agency shall make or update the report required under subd. 1. at least 13annually and shall submit reports to the appropriate standing committees of the 14legislature under s. 13.172 (3).SB201,5,1515(c) The department shall assist state agencies to comply with par. (b).SB201,416Section 4. 109.07 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB201,6,617109.07 (1m) (a) Subject to sub. (5) or (6), an employer that has decided upon a 18business closing or mass layoff in this state shall promptly notify the subunit of the 19department that administers s. 106.15, any affected employee, any collective 20bargaining representative of any affected employee, and the highest official of any 21municipality in which the affected employment site is located, in writing of such 22action no later than 60 days prior to the date on which the business closing or mass 23layoff takes place. The notice to an affected employee shall also include contact 24information for the local workforce development board under 29 USC 2832 serving 1the area in which the employment site is located and, if available, the list of 2resources prepared under s. 106.11 (1) (b). The employer shall provide in writing all 3information concerning its payroll, affected employees, and the wages and other 4remuneration owed to those employees as the department may require. The 5department may in addition require the employer to submit a plan setting forth the 6manner in which final payment in full shall be made to affected employees.SB201,6,77